Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.120

Office to determine how funds disbursed.

Funds appropriated for student financial assistance to be granted pursuant to this chapter shall be disbursed as determined by the office.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 164; 2004 c 275 s 41; 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 17. Formerly RCW 28B.10.818, 28.76.510.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.